Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5229
Base premium rate, defined.

Base premium rate shall mean for each class of business as to a rating period, the lowest premium rate charged or that could have been charged under a rating system for that class of business by the small employer carrier to small employers with similar case characteristics for health benefit plans with the same or similar coverage.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 7.